Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.050

Tenure of patrol officers.

Washington state patrol officers shall be entitled to retain their ranks and positions until death or resignation, or until suspended, demoted, or discharged in the manner hereinafter provided.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.43.050. Prior: 1943 c 205 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6362-66.]